New Jersey, session 222, A2086.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The Administrative Office of the Courts, in conjunction with the Attorney General, shall develop and maintain a publicly-accessible domestic violence Internet registry of any person in this State who: (1)   has been convicted of a crime or offense involving domestic violence as defined in subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19); or (2)   has had a final restraining order issued against them pursuant to the provisions of the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et al.); or (3)   has committed contempt of a temporary or final restraining order entered pursuant to the provisions of the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et al.). b.    The Internet registry established pursuant to this section shall be separate from the domestic violence central registry established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1999, c.421 (C.2C:25-34). c.     The Internet registry shall contain the following information for any person to be included in the registry: (1)   the persons name and any aliases the person has used or under which the person may be or may have been known; (2)   a brief description of any crime or offense involving domestic violence for which the person was convicted; the date and location of each disposition; and a general description of the persons modus operandi, if applicable; (3)   the persons age, race, gender, date of birth, height, weight, hair, eye color, and any distinguishing scars or tattoos; (4)   a photograph of the person and the date on which the photograph was entered into the registry; (5)   the make, model, color, year, and license plate number of any vehicle operated by the person; and (6)   the persons last known address. d.    A person whose name is erroneously included in the registry established pursuant to this section may petition the Administrative Office of the Courts for removal of the persons name.  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall remove the persons name from the registry in response to the petition if the person: (1)   has not had a final domestic violence restraining order entered against the person; or (2)   has not been found guilty of contempt of a temporary or final restraining order entered pursuant to the provisions of the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et al.); or (3)   has not been found guilty of a crime or offense involving domestic violence. e.     Within five days of a change of address, a person whose name is included in the Internet registry shall provide the Administrative Office of the Courts with the new address. f.     On the website through which a person may search the Internet registry, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall include the following information regarding: (1)   the manner in which a person may petition the Administrative Office of the Courts for removal of their name from the registry; (2)   the circumstances under which the Administrative Office of the Courts would grant the petition; and (3)   the manner in which a person may provide an updated address. 2.    a.  A law enforcement officer conducting an arrest shall determine if any domestic violence restraining order has been entered against the arrested person.  The determination shall include a search of the central registry created pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1999, c.421 (C.2C:25-34) and section 1 of P.L.   , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The Attorney General may promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment.